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DI3R8-01

DTC P 1745/38/ATF Temperature Sensor No.2 Circuit Mal-
function

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ATF temperature sensor No.2 converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the
Engine and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.

(2-tripdetectionlogic) ¢ Openorshortin ATF temperature sensor No.2
P0710/38 (a) Temperature sensorresistanceislessthan 79 Q * ATFtemperature sensorNo.2

(b) Afterthe engine has been operating for 15 minutes or ¢ Engineand ECT ECU

more, the resistance atthe temp. sensoris more than 156 k 2
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check ATF temperature sensor No.2.

PREPARATION:
Remove the ATF temperature sensor No.2
(See page AT-7).
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals ATF temperature sen-
sor No.2 at 20 °C (68 °F) and 110 °C (230 °F).
OK:
Resistance (Approx.):
Q07002 20 °C (68 °F): 12.2 kQ
110 °C (230 °F): 770 Q

NG> Replace the ATF temperature sensor No.2.

@

2 | Check harness and connector between ATF temperature sensor No.2 and Engine
and ECT ECU (See page IN-35).

@

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace the harness or connector.
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